Massachusetts, session 194th, H2678.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 7AA of Chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended, by inserting after the word “cab” in line 25, the following phrase:-,
"Or registered as part of a ride-share company,"
of 1